Utah statutes.
45-2-2.   Libel and slander defined.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Libel" means a malicious defamation, expressed either by printing or by signs or pictures or the like, tending to blacken the memory of one who is dead, or to impeach the honesty, integrity, virtue or reputation, or publish the natural defects of one who is alive, and thereby to expose him to public hatred, contempt or ridicule.

(2)  "Slander" means any libel communicated by spoken words.

